Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-603
Charter and general laws; force and effect.

In any city which adopts the city manager plan of government as provided in the City Manager Plan of Government Act, the charter and all general laws governing such city shall continue in full force and effect, except that if any provisions of such charter or laws are inconsistent with the act, the same shall be superseded.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 3, p. 498;

C.S.1922, § 4540;

C.S.1929, § 19-603;

R.S.1943, § 19-603;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 34.